Massachusetts, session 194th, S2436.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 17 of Chapter 90, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition of the General Laws,
is hereby amended by striking out the words, “ or construction area” and inserting in place
thereof the following words:- ", construction area, or school zones”.
of 1